Missouri, session 2026, HB2304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 161, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 161.854, to read as follows:
161.854. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Individualized education program" or "IEP", a written statement for a
child with a disability that is developed, reviewed, and revised in accordance with 34
CFR 300.320 to 300.324 and under 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended;
(2) "Local educational agency" or "LEA", a public school or other political
subdivision of the state serving any student with an IEP;
(3) "Parent", as defined in 34 CFR 300.30, or an emancipated child acting on the
child's own behalf;
(4) "Placement", the setting in which a student with a disability will receive such
student's special education and related services;
(5) "Public school", the same definition as in section 160.011;
(6) "School day", the same definition as in section 160.041.
2. Each local educational agency shall implement parental consent procedures as
described in 34 CFR 300.300 and this section.
3. (1) Each local educational agency shall obtain written or electronic parental
consent for the following placements, removals, additions, changes, or reductions of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2304 2
services in the individualized education program of a child with disabilities prior to such
placement, removal, addition, change, or reduction:
(a) Initial IEP placement and services;
(b) A placement change;
(c) The removal of a service or services; and
(d) The reduction or addition of service minutes of a service by more than
twenty-five percent.
(2) The LEA shall maintain written documentation of the date and signature of
parental consent for annual placement or revision to the IEP.
4. (1) (a) If the parents and local educational agency fail to reach an agreement
on the child's individualized education program within ten school days but reach an
agreement on certain IEP services or interim placement:
a. The child's current agreed-upon IEP shall be amended to include such areas
of agreement until the areas of disagreement are resolved; and
b. The local educational agency and the parents shall include an addendum in
the IEP that specifies the date by which the areas of disagreement shall be resolved,
provided that such date shall be within twenty school days of the initial meeting and
may be extended an additional twenty school days with consent from both parties if
sufficient progress is made or additional agreements are reached.
(b) If the local educational agency or the parents fail to reach an agreement at
any time during the IEP process, either party may request a dispute resolution option
including, but not limited to:
a. A facilitated IEP meeting;
b. A child complaint investigation;
c. State-paid mediation;
d. A due process complaint and hearing; or
e. Other dispute resolution options as outlined in the procedural safeguards
notice under 34 CFR 300.504.
(2) A local educational agency shall not proceed with implementing a child's
individualized education program without parental consent unless the LEA documents
reasonable efforts of attempts to arrange a mutually agreed-upon time and place, in
accordance with 34 CFR 300.322(d), and the parents have refused to attend or the LEA
obtains approval through a due process complaint and hearing in which the hearing
officer or commissioner finds that the IEP with the proposed change or changes
provides for a free appropriate public education for the student in accordance with 34
CFR 300.507 to 300.513.

HB 2304 3
5. Parents have the right to visit any program or classroom proposed for their
child before consenting to IEP changes if the child is identified as eligible for special
education services. A visit occurring under this subsection shall be scheduled before or
after regular school hours or at a mutually agreed-upon time to ensure that instruction
is not interrupted.
6. (1) The department of elementary and secondary education shall create or
establish a parental consent model form that each local educational agency shall use for
any action related to a child's individualized education program. Such form shall be
provided to the parents in the parent's native language, as described in 34 CFR 300.503,
and shall include at least the following:
(a) A "Does consent" box, signature line, and date line;
(b) A "Does NOT consent" box, signature line, and date line as well as a box
accompanying a statement that a parent who does not consent understands that the
LEA is relieved of any future claims related to nonprovision of any services not
consented to by the parent; and
(c) A "Partial consent" box, signature line, date line, and space for indicating the
areas of agreement.
(2) (a) A parental consent form shall not be required in situations where a
placement, removal, addition, change, or reduction of services in the IEP of a child with
disabilities occurs because of a violation of a code of student conduct in accordance with
34 CFR 300.530.
(b) On the date on which such placement, removal, addition, change, or
reduction of services in the IEP of a child with a disability occurs because of a violation
of a code of student conduct, the LEA shall notify the parents of that decision and
provide the parents with notice in accordance with 34 CFR 300.504.
7. This section shall not be construed to abrogate any parental right identified in
the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) and such act's
implementing regulations.
8. The provisions of this section shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
✔